srcV2/esu.lexc
–r̲pag|@²vag                 ! big N; large N
+a|+aar                     ! to V repeatedly
@+–`(g)ar(ar)te             ! to suddenly or immediately V; to V with short duration of action
@⁵+cete|.vkar               ! to let, allow, permit, cause, or compel one to V
+ciqe|@⁵ciiqe               ! to V in the future; will V
('a)                        ! used for [DemAdv][Loc] %~nete 
@+(r|l)i                    ! to become or cause to become V
@%:~(ng)ạ                   ! Consequential Mood @ for te->c and te°->l
@–ngr(ar)                   ! Concessive Mood @ for te unchanged and te°->le
@nga                        ! to be in a state of having V-ed; or having been V-ed
@³%:(u)cir|@⁵cir            ! condition of possessor with respect to V; incidence of V; occurrence of V
–r̲(ur)lur                   ! poor dear N ; to V (of poor, dear one)


!!!!!!! Multiple Forms !!!!!!
[e]                         ! weak e initial bases - optional e used for prosody
!(a)                         ! non-Yup'ik bases
!(aa)                        ! 
(ar)                        ! (aq*)/(ar*)/(ar) - NounDicForm/NounBaseForm/VerbBaseForm
(ar*)                       ! (aq*)/(ar*)/(ar) - NounDicForm/NounBaseForm/VerbBaseForm
! (ur)                        ! only in –r̲(ur)lur above


!!!!!!! ALLOMORPH OPERATORS !!!!!!
(e)                         ! is used only when a strong base-final consonant is kept
(g)                         ! is used with bases ending in two vowels
(ng)                        ! is used with bases ending in a vowel
(r)                         ! is used with bases ending in te, and by some speakers in e not preceded by t
(s)                         ! is used with bases ending in a vowel
(t)                         ! is used with bases ending in a consonant
(u)                         ! is used with bases ending in a consonant or e
(g|t)                       ! (g)(t) 
(r|l)                       ! @+(r/l)i-1 to become or cause to become V # used with adjectival verbs; the r is used with bases ending in a prime vowel, and the l with bases ending in e (but (special) te changes to l)
(u|i)                       ! consonant and e-ending bases (not te) use u ; te bases use i

!!!!!!! OPERATORS !!!!!!
! +                         ! keep final consonants of bases
! –                         ! drop final consonants of bases
! ~                         ! drop final e from bases
! %                         ! keep "strong" final consonants, drop "weak" final consonants
! :                         ! drop voiced velar continuant if they occur between single vowels
! '                         ! suffix causes gemination for bases of the form (C)VCe-
! .                         ! no change to either base or suffix at the juncture
! @                         ! te ending bases dependent suffix
@¹                          ! (@n postbase) drops t only when the t is preceded by a fricative; the fricative is then written devoiced
@²                          ! (@i|m|ng|t|v) drops t when the t is preceded by a fricative which is then written devoiced, and changes t to s (y in HBC) when the t is preceded by a vowel, unless the base is marked with °, in which case t is changed to l
@³                          ! (@(u)c|t) drops t when the t is preceded by a fricative which then becomes voiced, and changes t to y if preceded by a vowel, but to s (except in HBC) if the t is geminated on the base, unless the base is marked with °, in which case t is changed to l
@⁴                          ! (@ng|k|t) changes t to s (y in HBC) whether preceded by a vowel or fricative, unless the base is marked with °, in whcih case t is changed to l
@⁵                          ! (@c|l|ll|k|ng|p|t) drops any t
@ˡ                          ! (@l postbases) tl->ll
@ˁ                          ! (@ur postbases) te->q                    
@ʸ                          ! (@y postbases) ty->c 
! *                         ! base final r marked with asterisk to indicate "strong" base
! °                         ! special te
k̲ q̲ g̲ r̲ g̲g̲ r̲r̲               ! velar/uvular (front/back velar) assimilation


!!! Other !!!
! ʼ modifier letter indicating gemination, automatic gemination and automatic devoicing separator, separator for nʼg

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
    Exceptions      ;
    NonYupikBase    ;
    Particle        ;
    Ignorative      ;
    ProperNoun      ;
    NounBase        ;
    VerbBase        ;
    DimensionalRoot ;
    PosturalRoot    ;
    EmotionalRoot   ; 
    PersonalPronoun ;
    QuantQual       ;
    Demonstrative   ;
    Positional      ;
    Numeral         ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                       !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Exceptions              !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                       !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NonYupikBase
< [a:1|b:2|c:3|d:4|e:5|f:6|g:7|h:8|i:9|j:10|k:11|l:12|m:13|n:14|o:15|p:16|q:17|r:18|s:19|t:20|u:21|v:22|w:23|x:24|y:25|z:26|vv:27|ll:28|ss:29|gg:30|rr:31|ng:32|n͞g:33|u͡g:34|u͡gg:35|u͡r:36|u͡rr:37|m̄:38|n̄:39]+ %[NonYupik%]:0 >    NonYupikPostbase;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                       !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Particles               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                       !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ParticleEnd
[Particle]:              EncliticOrEnd;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Ignorative Words                  !!!!!!
!!!!!!          (for Interrogative Mood)               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NonYupikPostbase
-=+r[N→N]:%<=r                                   NounPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing
-=+(a)r[N→N]:%<=ar                               NounPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing
-=+(aa)r[N→N]:%<=aar                             NounPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing

-=+r[V→V]:%<=r                                   VerbPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing
-=+(a)r[V→V]:%<=ar                               VerbPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing
-=+(aa)r[V→V]:%<=aar                             VerbPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing

!-+(a)r[N→V]:%<+(a)r                             VerbPostbase; ! to say or “go”. . . (word or sound)

LEXICON Particle
acakikik                                       ParticleEnd; ! I told you so!
agu'u                                          ParticleEnd; ! don't!, no!
ak'a                                           ParticleEnd; ! past; a long time; already
ak'ami'i                                       ParticleEnd; ! that's all; the end
ak'atak                                        ParticleEnd; ! ouch!
akleng                                         ParticleEnd; ! poor thing!
ala-i:ala=i                                    ParticleEnd; ! oh my!
allami                                         ParticleEnd; ! last year; another place; a different location
allragniku                                     ParticleEnd; ! next year
amatiigni                                      ParticleEnd; ! the day before yesterday; the day before the day before yesterday
ampi                                           ParticleEnd; ! hurry up!, let's go!
angu                                           ParticleEnd; ! don't!; no!
anirta                                         ParticleEnd; ! thank goodness!; how fortunate!
aqaa                                           ParticleEnd; ! hello; what's the matter?, what are you doing here?, what can I do for you?; “what's up?”
asgutmun                                       ParticleEnd; ! in the upriver direction
ataki                                          ParticleEnd; ! let me see; well then; come on
atataarqu                                      ParticleEnd; ! a little later
ataucitun                                      ParticleEnd; ! like one; simultaneously; in unison
aullutarr'u                                    ParticleEnd; ! be careful of it/him!; watch out for it/him!
cali                                           ParticleEnd; ! more; furthermore; again; also; still; yet; and
ciunganitun                                    ParticleEnd; ! as previously; as in the past; as before (it)
cuna-gguq:cuna=gguq                            ParticleEnd; ! and so; apparently
cungarpak¹:cungarpak                           ParticleEnd; ! all green
elliinginaq                                    ParticleEnd; ! in vain; without purpose
ellmacuar(aq*)                                 ParticleEnd; ! a little bit
icivaaraqu                                     ParticleEnd; ! in the near future; soon
ik'apassi                                      ParticleEnd; ! ugh!; yuck!
ilutmun                                        ParticleEnd; ! inward
kass'aturrlainaq                               ParticleEnd; ! in English only
kiika-wa:kiika=wa                              ParticleEnd; ! I too wish it were so!
kitek                                          ParticleEnd; ! well then; please; okay
nak'nirmek                                     ParticleEnd; ! since when
nutem                                          ParticleEnd; ! from the beginning; originally
qaku                                           ParticleEnd; ! when? (in the future); how long from now?; a certain unspecified (or unspecifiable) time afterward
qayuwa                                         ParticleEnd; ! this time; to my surprise; for some unknown reason; how?
takelmun                                       ParticleEnd; ! marking, cutting, moving, etc. lengthwise
taunginaq                                      ParticleEnd; ! without anyone intending it to be so
tuamta-llu:tuamta=llu                          ParticleEnd; ! then again; furthermore; moreover
ukaniku                                        ParticleEnd; ! in the near future
unuamek                                        ParticleEnd; ! today
utelmun                                        ParticleEnd; ! homeward, toward one's point of origin
wagg'uq                                        ParticleEnd; ! that is to say; in other words; it is called
waniwa                                         ParticleEnd; ! now
wat'um                                         ParticleEnd; ! nalliini now at this time
assipiaq                                       ParticleEnd; ! very good!; just fine!
iiRgii:iirgii                                  ParticleEnd; ! oh dear!; how scary!
kassutmun                                      ParticleEnd; ! going around something circumferentially
kinami                                         ParticleEnd; ! because
naamelliin                                     ParticleEnd; ! I don't know
nutaan                                         ParticleEnd; ! just now/then for the good; finally!
qaill'                                         ParticleEnd; ! how
taaki                                          ParticleEnd; ! oh my!
tarr'i                                         ParticleEnd; ! listen; let's see
LEXICON Ignorative
qakuan                   ParticleEnd; ! when some time had elapsed
